Colorado, session 2026A, HB1284.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) The submetering of utility services produces substantial
conservation benefits, especially for water utility service in multiunit
residential buildings, such as apartment buildings, condominiums, and
common interest communities; and
(b) Billing practices for utilities should be codified in Colorado
law to provide clarity, promote transparency, and protect tenants.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 16 to article
12 of title 38 as follows:
PART 16
TENANT UTILITY BILLING AND SUBMETERING
38-12-1601. Definitions.
-2- HB26-1284

AS USED IN THIS PART 16, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "ASSOCIATION" OR "UNIT OWNERS' ASSOCIATION" HAS THE
MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 38-33.3-103 (3).
(2) "COMMON AREAS" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
38-12-502 (2) AND INCLUDES COMMON ELEMENTS, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
38-33.3-103 (5).
(3) "COMMON EXPENSES" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 38-33.3-103 (7).
(4) (a) "COMMON INTEREST COMMUNITY" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 38-33.3-103 (8).
(b) "COMMON INTEREST COMMUNITY" INCLUDES:
(I) A CONDOMINIUM;
(II) A COOPERATIVE; OR
(III) A PLANNED COMMUNITY.
(5) "CONDOMINIUM" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
38-33.3-103 (9).
(6) "DWELLING UNIT" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
38-12-502 (3).
(7) (a) "LANDLORD" MEANS THE OWNER, MANAGER, LESSOR,
SUBLESSOR, SUCCESSOR IN INTEREST, OR AGENT OF THE OWNER OF A
RESIDENTIAL PREMISES.
(b) "LANDLORD" INCLUDES A UNIT OWNER OR AN ASSOCIATION
ACTING AS A LANDLORD WITH RESPECT TO ANY LEASED UNIT WITHIN A
COMMON INTEREST COMMUNITY.
(8) "RATIO UTILITY BILLING SYSTEM" MEANS THE ALLOCATION OF
UTILITY SERVICE COSTS AMONG TENANTS ACCORDING TO FACTORS SUCH
-3- HB26-1284

AS SQUARE FOOTAGE, OCCUPANCY, OR OTHER PHYSICAL CHARACTERISTICS
OF A TENANT'S DWELLING UNIT.
(9) "RENTAL AGREEMENT" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 38-12-502 (7).
(10) "RESIDENTIAL PREMISES" MEANS A DWELLING UNIT, THE
STRUCTURE THAT THE UNIT IS A PART OF, AND THE COMMON AREAS.
(11) "SUBMETER" MEANS A DEVICE THAT MEASURES THE
CONSUMPTION OF UTILITY SERVICES FOR A DWELLING UNIT WITHIN A
RESIDENTIAL PREMISES AND IS OWNED OR OPERATED BY THE LANDLORD
OR LANDLORD'S AGENT, THE UNIT OWNER, OR THE ASSOCIATION.
(12) "TENANT" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
38-12-502 (9).
(13) "THIRD-PARTY BILLING AGENT" MEANS A PERSON, OTHER
THAN A LANDLORD, THAT IS ENGAGED TO PROVIDE UTILITY MANAGEMENT
SERVICES ON BEHALF OF THE LANDLORD, WHICH SERVICES MAY INCLUDE:
(a) INSTALLING A SUBMETER;
(b) READING A SUBMETER;
(c) CALCULATING RATIO UTILITY BILLING SYSTEMS; OR
(d) HANDLING UTILITY BILLING AND COLLECTIONS.
(14) "UNIT" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 38-33.3-103
(30).
(15) "UNIT OWNER" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
38-33.3-103 (31).
(16) "UTILITY SERVICE" MEANS SERVICE PROVIDED BY A UTILITY
TO A RESIDENTIAL PREMISES AND INCLUDES WATER SERVICE, GAS SERVICE,
ELECTRICITY SERVICE, TRASH OR RECYCLING SERVICES, AND HEATING OR
COOLING SERVICES.
-4- HB26-1284

(17) "WATER SERVICE" MEANS UTILITY SERVICE RELATED TO
WATER TREATMENT, WATER DISTRIBUTION, OR WATER USAGE THAT IS
PROVIDED BY A UTILITY TO A RESIDENTIAL PREMISES, INCLUDING WATER,
SEWER, STORM WATER, AND FLOOD CONTROL SERVICES.
38-12-1602. Utility service billing methods.
(1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION, A
LANDLORD, A UNIT OWNER, AN ASSOCIATION, OR A THIRD-PARTY BILLING
AGENT MAY USE A RATIO UTILITY BILLING SYSTEM OR A SUBMETER TO
DETERMINE THE AMOUNT TO CHARGE A TENANT FOR UTILITY SERVICE TO
THE TENANT'S DWELLING UNIT.
(2) (a) A LANDLORD, A UNIT OWNER, A DEVELOPER, OR AN
ASSOCIATION FOR A NEWLY CONSTRUCTED RESIDENTIAL PREMISES THAT
APPLIES FOR INITIAL WATER SERVICE ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027,
SHALL INSTALL SUBMETERS FOR EACH DWELLING UNIT AT THE
RESIDENTIAL PREMISES.
(b) A LANDLORD, A UNIT OWNER, OR AN ASSOCIATION SHALL
MAINTAIN THE SUBMETERS INSTALLED AT THE RESIDENTIAL PREMISES AND
SEND A BILL TO THE TENANT OF THE DWELLING UNIT FOR WATER SERVICE
BASED ON THE DWELLING UNIT'S SUBMETER MEASUREMENT OF WATER
USAGE.
38-12-1603. Submeter requirements.
(1) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 38-12-1602 (2)(a), A
LANDLORD, A UNIT OWNER, AN ASSOCIATION, OR A THIRD-PARTY BILLING
AGENT SHALL BILL A TENANT FOR WATER SERVICE BASED ON THE ACTUAL
SUBMETER READING FOR THE SUBMETER ASSOCIATED WITH THE TENANT'S
DWELLING UNIT. THE TENANT'S BILL FOR WATER SERVICE MUST INCLUDE:
(a) THE SUBMETER READINGS FOR THE BEGINNING AND END DATES
-5- HB26-1284

OF THE BILLING CYCLE;
(b) THE RATE AT WHICH THE UTILITY SERVICE IS BEING PROVIDED;
AND
(c) ANY SUBMETER READINGS THAT ARE ESTIMATED.
(2) (a) IF A TENANT SUSPECTS THAT A SUBMETER IS
MALFUNCTIONING, THE TENANT SHALL NOTIFY THE LANDLORD, UNIT
OWNER, OR ASSOCIATION IN WRITING OF THE MALFUNCTION.
(b) (I) A LANDLORD, A UNIT OWNER, OR AN ASSOCIATION THAT
RECEIVES NOTICE OF A MALFUNCTIONING SUBMETER SHALL INVESTIGATE
WHETHER THE SUBMETER IS PROPERLY RECORDING THE TENANT'S UTILITY
SERVICE WITHIN FOURTEEN BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE NOTICE.
(II) IF A LANDLORD, A UNIT OWNER, OR AN ASSOCIATION
DETERMINES THAT A SUBMETER IS INACCURATE, THE LANDLORD, UNIT
OWNER, OR ASSOCIATION MUST REPAIR OR REPLACE THE SUBMETER AT NO
COST TO THE TENANT.
(3) IF A SUBMETER READING CANNOT BE OBTAINED, AN ESTIMATED
READING FOR UTILITY SERVICE MAY BE USED FOR NO LONGER THAN SIX
CONSECUTIVE MONTHS, AND ANY ESTIMATE MUST BE BASED ON PRIOR
USAGE OF UTILITY SERVICES FOR THE DWELLING UNIT.
(4) FOR A UTILITY SERVICE SYSTEM THAT CALCULATES USAGE
WITHOUT A SUBMETER, INCLUDING VARIABLE REFRIGERANT FLOW
SYSTEMS, A SYSTEM-PROVIDED CONSUMPTION READING MAY BE USED FOR
BILLING A TENANT FOR THE UTILITY SERVICE.
38-12-1604. Rental agreement requirements.
(1) BEFORE EXECUTING A RENTAL AGREEMENT WITH A TENANT, A
LANDLORD, A UNIT OWNER, OR AN ASSOCIATION THAT INTENDS TO CHARGE
THE TENANT FOR UTILITY SERVICE SEPARATELY FROM RENT SHALL
-6- HB26-1284

CLEARLY DISCLOSE TO THE TENANT, IN WRITING, THE FOLLOWING:
(a) THAT THE TENANT WILL BE BILLED FOR UTILITY SERVICE
SEPARATE FROM THE TENANT'S RENTAL PAYMENT;
(b) ANY ADMINISTRATIVE FEE THAT WILL BE CHARGED BY THE
LANDLORD, WHICH FEES MUST NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNTS FOR FEES SET
FORTH IN SECTION 38-12-801 (3)(a)(VI);
(c) THE METHOD BY WHICH THE LANDLORD, UNIT OWNER, OR
ASSOCIATION WILL BILL THE TENANT FOR UTILITY SERVICE; AND
(d) THAT THE TENANT MAY REQUEST, IN WRITING, A COPY OF THE
INVOICE SENT TO THE LANDLORD BY A UTILITY SERVICE PROVIDER AND AN
EXPLANATION OR CALCULATION OF CHARGES FOR THE TENANT'S UTILITY
SERVICE, WHICH SHALL BE PROVIDED TO THE TENANT WITHIN FOURTEEN
BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE TENANT'S REQUEST.
38-12-1605. Ratio utility billing standards - monthly billing
requirements - prohibition on profits for utility service charges.
(1) IF A LANDLORD, A UNIT OWNER, OR AN ASSOCIATION USES A
RATIO UTILITY BILLING SYSTEM TO CHARGE A TENANT FOR UTILITY
SERVICE, THE LANDLORD, UNIT OWNER, OR ASSOCIATION SHALL:
(a) DISCLOSE TO THE TENANT IN THE RENTAL AGREEMENT THAT
THE TENANT WILL BE CHARGED FOR UTILITY SERVICE BASED ON A RATIO
UTILITY BILLING SYSTEM;
(b) PROVIDE THE TENANT WITH THE FORMULA USED BY THE
LANDLORD, UNIT OWNER, OR ASSOCIATION TO CALCULATE THE TENANT'S
UTILITY COST AND STATE THAT FORMULA ON THE TENANT'S UTILITY BILL
EACH MONTH; AND
(c) DISCLOSE WHETHER THE RATIO UTILITY BILLING SYSTEM
FORMULA TAKES INTO ACCOUNT THE OCCUPANCY OF A DWELLING UNIT
-7- HB26-1284

AND HOW MANY OCCUPANTS ARE ASSOCIATED WITH THE DWELLING UNIT.
(2) A LANDLORD, A UNIT OWNER, OR AN ASSOCIATION THAT
EMPLOYS A RATIO UTILITY BILLING SYSTEM TO CHARGE A TENANT FOR
UTILITY SERVICE SHALL DEDUCT AT LEAST TEN PERCENT OF THE TOTAL
AMOUNT OF THE UTILITY BILL RECEIVED BY THE LANDLORD, UNIT OWNER,
OR ASSOCIATION TO ACCOUNT FOR UTILITY SERVICE TO COMMON AREAS
OF A RESIDENTIAL PREMISES BEFORE ALLOCATING CHARGES TO A TENANT
FOR THE TENANT'S DWELLING UNIT.
(3) A TENANT'S MONTHLY BILL FOR UTILITY SERVICE MUST ONLY
INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING CHARGES:
(a) THE AMOUNT DUE FOR THE UTILITY SERVICE PROVIDED TO THE
TENANT AS CALCULATED BY:
(I) A MEASUREMENT FROM A SUBMETER FOR THE UTILITY SERVICE;
OR
(II) A RATIO UTILITY BILLING SYSTEM;
(b) A FEE IN THE AMOUNT AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO SECTION
38-12-801 (3)(a)(VI); AND
(c) IF A UNIT OWNER OR AN ASSOCIATION RECOVERS FROM THE
TENANT ANY PORTION OF AN ASSOCIATION ASSESSMENT THAT IS
ATTRIBUTABLE TO UTILITY SERVICE, AN ITEMIZED STATEMENT THAT
IDENTIFIES THE UTILITY SERVICE PORTION OF THE ASSESSMENT THAT IS
SEPARATE FROM ALL OTHER COMMON EXPENSES.
(4) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT A LANDLORD, A UNIT OWNER,
AN ASSOCIATION, OR A THIRD-PARTY BILLING AGENT FROM INCLUDING
OTHER LAWFUL CHARGES, INCLUDING RENT, ON THE SAME BILL THAT IS
PROVIDED TO A TENANT FOR UTILITY SERVICE.
38-12-1606. Damages - attorney fees.
-8- HB26-1284

(1) IF A LANDLORD, A UNIT OWNER, OR AN ASSOCIATION VIOLATES
THIS PART 16, THE AGGRIEVED TENANT MAY FILE A CIVIL ACTION IN COURT
AND, IF THE TENANT PREVAILS, RECOVER:
(a) ACTUAL DAMAGES RESULTING FROM BILLING OVERAGES THAT
WERE CHARGED TO THE TENANT FOR UTILITY SERVICE;
(b) ADDITIONAL DAMAGES IN AN AMOUNT NOT TO EXCEED
TWENTY-FIVE PERCENT OF THE TOTAL OVERAGE AMOUNT CHARGED TO
THE TENANT; AND
(c) ATTORNEY FEES AND COURT COSTS.
(2) NOTHING IN THIS PART 16 SHALL BE CONSTRUED AS
CLASSIFYING A LANDLORD OR THIRD-PARTY BILLING AGENT AS A PUBLIC
UTILITY OR COLLECTION AGENCY.
38-12-1607. Prohibition on waiving tenant's rights.
(1) A DECLARATION, RULE, OR PROVISION OF A RENTAL
AGREEMENT MAY NOT WAIVE OR DIMINISH THE PROTECTIONS OR REMEDIES
AVAILABLE TO A TENANT UNDER THIS PART 16.
(2) A DECLARATION, RULE, OR PROVISION OF A RENTAL
AGREEMENT THAT CONFLICTS WITH THIS PART 16 IS VOID AND
UNENFORCEABLE.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
-9- HB26-1284

to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to conduct occurring and rental agreements
entered into or renewed on or after January 1, 2027.
-10- HB26-1284